North Dakota, session 69, HB1154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 23-09.3-01.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Basic care beds may not be added to the state's licensed bed capacity during the period
between August 1, 20232025, and July 31, 20252029, except if:
a. A nursing facility converts nursing facility beds to basic care;
b. An entity licenses bed capacity transferred as basic care bed capacity under section
23-16-01.1;
c. An entity demonstrates to the department that basic care services are not readily
available within a designated area of the state or that existing basic care beds within a
fifty-mile [80.47-kilometer] radius have been occupied at ninety percent or more for the
previous twelve months. In determining whether basic care services will be readily
available if an additional license is issued, preference may be given to an entity that
agrees to any participation program established by the department for individuals eligible
for services under the medical assistance program under title XIX of the Social Security
Act [42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.]; or
d. The department grant approval of new basic care beds to an entity. The approved entity
shall license the beds within forty-eight months from the date of approval.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 23-16-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Notwithstanding sections 23-16-06 and 23-16-10, except when a facility reverts basic care
beds to nursing facility beds or relicenses nursing facility beds delicensed after July 31, 2011,
nursing facility beds may not be added to the state's licensed bed capacity during the period
between August 1, 20232025, and July 31, 20252029. A nursing facility may not delicense
nursing facility bed capacity, relicense nursing facility bed capacity, convert licensed nursing
bed capacity to basic care bed capacity, revert licensed basic care bed capacity back to
nursing facility bed capacity, or otherwise reconfigure licensed nursing facility bed capacity
more than two times in a twelve-month period.

H. B. NO. 1154 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1154.
House Vote: Yeas 69 Nays 20 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State